Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2202.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "household income" in section 1303 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended to read:Section 1303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Household income." All income received by a claimant and 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 the claimant's spouse while residing in the homestead during the calendar year for which a rebate is claimed[.] from which the claimant can deduct money spent on utilities during the calendar year for which a rebate is claimed.* * *Section 2. Section 1306(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1306. Proof of claim.(a) Contents.--Each claim shall include:* * *(5) Copies of household utility expenses, including water, sewer, electric and natural gas bills as applicable.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2202PN2895 - 2 - 1234567891011121314